Maryland, session 2025, SB0361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
16–201.
(a) (1) In this section[, “influence”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “FRAUD” INCLUDES THE USE OF SYNTHETIC MEDIA.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0361*

SENATE BILL 361
(3) “INFLUENCE” includes the use of pressure, deception, trickery, or
direct or indirect authority to induce action or to change the decision or act of another,
regardless of the medium used.
(4) “SYNTHETIC MEDIA” MEANS AN IMAGE, AN AUDIO RECORDING, OR
A VIDEO RECORDING THAT HAS BEEN INTENTIONALLY CREATED OR MANIPULATED
WITH THE USE OF GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE OR OTHER DIGITAL
TECHNOLOGY TO CREATE A REALISTIC BUT FALSE IMAGE, AUDIO RECORDING, OR
VIDEO RECORDING:
(I) PURPORTING TO DEPICT A REAL, CLEARLY IDENTIFIED
CANDIDATE OR THE SPEECH OR CONDUCT OF THE CANDIDATE; OR
(II) PRODUCING A FUNDAMENTALLY DIFFERENT
UNDERSTANDING OR IMPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S APPEARANCE, SPEECH, OR
CONDUCT THAN A REASONABLE INDIVIDUAL WOULD HAVE FROM THE UNALTERED,
ORIGINAL VERSION OF THE IMAGE, AUDIO RECORDING, OR VIDEO RECORDING.
(b) A person may not willfully and knowingly:
(1) (i) impersonate another person in order to vote or attempt to vote;
or
(ii) vote or attempt to vote under a false name;
(2) vote more than once for a candidate for the same office or for the same
ballot question;
(3) vote or attempt to vote more than once in the same election, or vote in
more than one election district or precinct;
(4) vote in an election district or precinct without the legal authority to vote
in that election district or precinct;
(5) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s voting decision through the
use of force, FRAUD, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward;
(6) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s decision, through the use of
force, fraud, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward, whether to:
(i) go to the polls to cast a vote; or
(ii) vote by other lawful means; or

SENATE BILL 361 3
(7) engage in conduct that results or has the intent to result in the denial
or abridgement of the right of any citizen of the United States to vote on account of race,
color, or disability.
(c) Except as provided in § 16–1002 of this title, a person who violates this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine of not more than $5,000 or
imprisonment for not more than 5 years or both.
(d) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.